Massachusetts, session 194th, H4071.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding section 5A of chapter 3 of the General Laws, section 20 of
chapter 6C of the General Laws, section 7E of chapter 81 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation or a designee, shall convey to the Fall River redevelopment authority certain
parcels of land, owned by the Massachusetts Department of Transportation, containing 20+/-
acres of vacant land, previously taken and used for highway purposes, located along Davol street
in the city of Fall River to be more fully described on a survey to be prepared at the time of
transfer by the Fall River redevelopment authority and approved by the Massachusetts
Department of Transportation. Said conveyance shall be subject to adequate compensation as set
forth in section 3 of this act and agreed to by executive heads of the Massachusetts Department
of Transportation and the Fall River redevelopment authority.
of 3

SECTION 2. (a) Notwithstanding chapter 121B of the General Laws or any other general
or special law to the contrary, the Fall River redevelopment authority may purchase from the
Massachusetts Department of Transportation subject to terms acceptable to the parties and to the
parcels of land described in this act.
(b) The Fall River redevelopment authority may develop the parcels of land described in
this act for residential, retail, commercial, restaurant and other economic development purposes,
without the necessity of adopting or adhering to an urban renewal plan, as defined in section 1 of
chapter 121B of the General Laws, and with respect to said land the Fall River redevelopment
authority shall enjoy the statutory authority it would possess for land and structures and other
property within an urban renewal project as defined by said section 1 of said chapter 121B.
SECTION 3. The consideration for the conveyance as authorized in this act by the Fall
River redevelopment authority shall reflect 50 per cent of the fair market value of each parcel
sold or leased by the Fall River redevelopment authority over a 10-year period from the time of
the enactment of this act. The parcels shall be conveyed in its present condition, as is, where is
and with all faults, through the Massachusetts Department of Transportation’s standard form
release deed.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Fall River
redevelopment authority shall be responsible for all costs and expenses associated with the
conveyance authorized in this act including, but not limited to, all costs associated with any
engineering, surveys, appraisals and deed preparation as such costs may be determined by the
secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
of 3

SECTION 5. In the event that the parcels of land comprising 20+/- acres conveyed by
this act cease to be used by the Fall River redevelopment authority, the developers selected and
any other subsequent owners for the purposes described in section 2 of this act at any time then,
upon notice by the secretary of the Massachusetts Department of Transportation or a designee,
said parcels of land shall revert to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation. Should said
parcels of land comprising the 20+ acres revert to the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, any further disposition thereof shall be subject to the provisions of section 5A of
chapter 3 of the General Laws, section 20 of chapter 6C of the General Laws and section 7E of
chapter 81 of the General Laws and to the prior approval of the general court.
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 3